Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1631
Bonds; approval by district court; interested parties; pleadings.

Any person, interested in the district or in the issuance of the bonds thereof, may move to dismiss the petition or answer thereto. The provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure respecting motions and answer to a petition shall be applicable to motions and answer to the petition in such special proceedings. The persons filing motions or answering the petition shall be the defendants to the special proceedings, and the board of trustees shall be the plaintiff. Every material statement of the petition not specially controverted by the answer must, for the purpose of such special proceedings, be taken as true. Each person failing to answer the petition shall be deemed to admit as true all the material statements of the petition. The rules of pleading and practice provided by the Code of Civil Procedure, which are not inconsistent with the provisions of sections 39-1601 to 39-1636, are applicable to the special proceedings herein provided for.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. III, § 31, p. 537.